New Mexico, session 2026, SB29.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 22-10A-6 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1986,
Chapter 33, Section 8, as amended) is amended to read:
"22-10A-6. EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS FOR LICENSURE.--
A. The department shall require a person seeking
licensure or reciprocity in elementary, special, early
childhood or secondary education to have completed the
following minimum requirements in the college of arts and
sciences:
(1) nine semester hours in communication;
(2) six semester hours in mathematics;
(3) eight semester hours in laboratory
science;
(4) nine semester hours in social and
behavioral science; and
(5) nine semester hours in humanities and
fine arts. SB 29
Page 1

B. In addition to the requirements specified in
Subsections A and C of this section, the department shall
require that a person seeking standard or alternative
elementary licensure shall have completed six hours of
reading courses and six hours of mathematics methods courses.
A person seeking standard or alternative secondary licensure
shall have completed three hours of reading courses in
subject matter content and, if seeking a mathematics
endorsement, six hours of mathematics methods courses. The
hours of mathematics methods required by this 2026 act shall
apply to licenses issued on or after July 1, 2028.
C. Except for licensure by reciprocity, the
department shall require, prior to initial licensure, no less
than sixteen weeks of student teaching, a portion of which
shall occur in the first thirty credit hours taken in the
college of education and shall be under the direct
supervision of a teacher and a portion of which shall occur

in the student's senior year with the student teacher being

directly responsible for the classroom.

D. Nothing in this section shall preclude the

department from establishing or accepting equivalent

requirements for purposes of reciprocal licensure or minimum

requirements for alternative licensure.

E. Vocational teacher preparatory programs may be

exempt from Subsections A through C of this section upon a
SB 29
Page 2

determination by the department that other licensure
requirements are more appropriate for vocational teacher
preparatory programs.
F. Before December 31, 2021, the department shall
create a license endorsement in secondary computer science
available to all teachers who hold a valid license and
demonstrate sufficient content knowledge in computer science
as determined by the department. The department shall
consult with computer science education experts with
experience in creating or supporting computer science
endorsement pathways when developing computer science
endorsement requirements."
SECTION 2. Section 22-15E-1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2007,
Chapter 44, Section 1 and Laws 2007, Chapter 239, Section 1)
is amended to read:
"22-15E-1. SHORT TITLE.-- Chapter 22, Article 15E NMSA
1978 may be cited as the "Mathematics and Science Education

Act"."

SECTION 3. Section 22-15E-2 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2007,

Chapter 44, Section 2 and Laws 2007, Chapter 239, Section 2)

is amended to read:

"22-15E-2. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Mathematics and

Science Education Act:

A. "bureau" means the mathematics and science

bureau;
SB 29
Page 3

B. "chief" means the chief of the bureau;
C. "council" means the mathematics and science
advisory council;
D. "mathematics difficulty" means a student's
inability to perform at grade level when learning or applying
mathematical concepts, as determined by screening or other
assessments;
E. "mathematics instructional leadership
framework" means a structured, evidence-based model developed
by the department to strengthen mathematics teaching and
learning;
F. "mathematics professional learning plan" means
a plan developed by a school district or charter school on a
department-provided template that is aligned with the
department's mathematics instructional leadership framework;
G. "mathematics screening assessment" means a
department-approved, grade-specific and nondiagnostic

assessment administered at the beginning of the school year

to assess a student's performance in mathematics; and

H. "mathematics support plan" means a written plan

developed for a student on a department-provided template

that identifies individualized and differentiated areas of

mathematics learning needs and that describes specific

intervention strategies that will be provided at school and

strategies that can be used by parents to support student
SB 29
Page 4

learning."
SECTION 4. Section 22-15E-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2007,
Chapter 44, Section 3 and Laws 2007, Chapter 239, Section 3)
is amended to read:
"22-15E-3. BUREAU CREATED--DUTIES.--
A. The "mathematics and science bureau" is created
in the department. The secretary shall appoint the chief as
provided in the Public Education Department Act.
B. The bureau shall:
(1) administer the provisions of the
Mathematics and Science Education Act;
(2) provide staff support for and coordinate
the activities of the council;
(3) work with the council to develop a
statewide strategic plan for mathematics and science
education in the public schools and coordinate education
activities with other state agencies, the federal government,

business consortia and public or private organizations or

other persons;

(4) ensure that school districts' plans

include goals for improving mathematics and science education

aligned to the department's strategic plan;

(5) recommend funding mechanisms that

support the improvement of mathematics and science education

in the state, including web-based mathematics and science
SB 29
Page 5

curricula, mentoring and web-based homework assistance;
(6) promote partnerships among public
schools, higher education institutions, government, business
and educational and community organizations to improve the
mathematics and science education in the state;
(7) monitor the use of instructional
materials and evaluate instructional programs and
professional learning programs in mathematics and science to
ensure alignment with state academic content and performance
standards;
(8) assess the outcomes of efforts to
improve mathematics and science education using existing
data;
(9) in collaboration with the council,
develop guidelines for school districts and charter schools
to use when developing mathematics professional learning
plans, mathematics screening assessments in kindergarten

through third grade, mathematics support plans and

mathematics intervention services;

(10) provide training and technical

assistance to school districts and charter schools on

developing mathematics professional learning plans,

implementing mathematics screening assessments, developing

mathematics support plans and mathematics interventions,

including selecting evidence-based instructional materials,
SB 29
Page 6

monitoring student progress and involving parents;
(11) adopt grade-specific mathematics
assessments that can be administered with minimal impact on
instructional time; and
(12) provide for timely reporting of
assessment results that can be integrated with instructional
support for teachers and students."
SECTION 5. A new section of the Mathematics and Science
Education Act is enacted to read:
"MATHEMATICS INSTRUCTIONAL LEADERSHIP FRAMEWORK--
MATHEMATICS PROFESSIONAL LEARNING PLANS.--
A. By December 31, 2026, the department and
bureau, in consultation with the council, shall develop and
publish a mathematics instructional leadership framework that
includes the following:
(1) defined roles and responsibilities of
instructional leaders, including principals, instructional

coaches and teacher leaders, in supporting mathematics

instruction;

(2) standards for high-quality mathematics

instruction and professional learning aligned with state

academic content and performance standards and evidence-based

research;

(3) core competencies for teachers and

instructional leaders in mathematics pedagogy, data use and
SB 29
Page 7

student engagement;
(4) guidance for implementing mathematics
coaching, mentoring and collaborative planning structures to
improve classroom practice;
(5) procedures for monitoring, evaluating,
supporting and continuously improving mathematics teaching
and learning at the public school, school district and state
levels; and
(6) a description of technical assistance
that may be provided to school districts and charter schools
to support mathematics instruction.
B. Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, each
school district and charter school shall develop and implement
elementary and secondary mathematics professional learning
plans that include:
(1) goals for teacher content knowledge and
instructional practices in mathematics;

(2) a description of professional learning

activities and instructional supports; and

(3) a plan to monitor and evaluate

professional learning in mathematics over time.

C. Mathematics professional learning plans shall

be aligned to the department's mathematics instructional

leadership framework and shall be developed in cooperation

with teachers and public school administrators and shall be
SB 29
Page 8

updated at least once every two years."
SECTION 6. A new section of the Mathematics and Science
Education Act is enacted to read:
"KINDERGARTEN THROUGH THIRD GRADE MATHEMATICS SCREENING
AND EVALUATIONS--INTERVENTIONS--SUPPORT.--
A. Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, each
school district and charter school shall administer a
mathematics screening assessment to every student in
kindergarten through third grade.
B. If a school determines that a student in
kindergarten through third grade displays characteristics of a
mathematics difficulty as determined by an analysis of the
student's mathematics screening assessment, the public school
shall, within thirty days of the determination, notify the
student's parent of the results and provide a mathematics
support plan that includes:
(1) a description of the student's

mathematics screening assessment results and specific areas of

need;

(2) mathematics interventions that will be

provided to the student;

(3) an assurance that the parent will

receive written reports on the student's progress at least

four times each school year; and

(4) strategies that can be used by parents
SB 29
Page 9

to support student learning.
C. Mathematics interventions provided to students
shall be aligned to the department's mathematics instructional
leadership framework and the school's mathematics professional
learning plan and shall:
(1) include a multilayered system of support
that progresses from less intensive to more intensive based on
the student's needs;
(2) be aligned to core instruction;
(3) be targeted, differentiated and
supplemental to core instruction; and
(4) be aligned with evidence-based
instructional strategies.
D. The department shall provide guidance on the
interventions and multilayered system of support that a public
school is required to provide pursuant to Subsection C of this
section."

SECTION 7. A new section of the Mathematics and Science

Education Act is enacted to read:

"ADMINISTRATION--REPORTING.--

A. By December 31, 2026, the department, in

consultation with the council, shall promulgate rules to

implement the provisions of the Mathematics and Science

Education Act. Rules shall include criteria for approved

mathematics screening assessments, standards for the
SB 29
Page 10

mathematics instructional leadership framework and mathematics
professional learning plans and identified mathematics
interventions.
B. No later than July 1, 2028 and no later than
July 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall prepare
and submit to the governor and the legislative education study
committee a report that includes the following:
(1) the number of students by grade level
identified with mathematics difficulty and served through
mathematics support plans;
(2) the types and effectiveness of
interventions implemented;
(3) implementation status of the mathematics
instructional leadership framework and mathematics
professional learning plans across school districts and
charter schools; and
(4) recommendations for legislative or

budgetary action to improve mathematics instruction and

student outcomes." SB 29
Page 11